California statutes. Financial Code
No licensee shall engage in any business other than one or more of the following:

(a) The business of providing financing assistance and management assistance to business firms.

(b) The business of a state development company in accordance with all applicable provisions of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958 and of the regulations of the Small Business Administration.

(c) The business of a local development company in accordance with all applicable
 provisions of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958 and of the regulations of the Small Business Administration.

(d) The business of a small business investment company in accordance with all applicable provisions of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958 and of the regulations of the Small Business Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 867, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

31402.

Each licensee shall use its best efforts:

(a) To provide financing assistance to business firms in this state in cooperation with the Small Business Administration pursuant to Section 7(a) of the Small Business Act;

(b) To obtain loans from the Small Business Administration pursuant to Sections 501 and 502 of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958; and

(c) Otherwise to cooperate with, and meet the requirements of, the Small Business Administration for the purpose of providing
 financing assistance and management assistance to business firms in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31403.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no licensee shall provide financing assistance or management assistance to any person other than a business firm in this state.

(b) (1) If a licensee provides financing assistance to a business firm in this state, the licensee may also provide financing assistance and management assistance to the business firm with respect to business transacted in any other state of the United States or the District of Columbia.

(2) If a licensee provides
 financing assistance to a business firm in this state which is a franchisor, the licensee may also provide financing assistance and management assistance to any business firm in another state which is a franchisee of the franchisor.

(3) If a licensee provides financing assistance to a business firm in this state which is a franchisee of a franchisor, the licensee may also provide financing assistance and management assistance to any business firm in another state which is a franchisee of the franchisor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 867, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

31404.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b) of Section 31403, no licensee shall provide financing assistance or management assistance for use outside this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 867, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

31405.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 31406:

(a) No licensee shall provide financing assistance or management assistance to any business firm the primary business of which is to provide financing assistance or management assistance.

(b) No licensee shall provide financing assistance to any business firm for the purpose of providing financing assistance to other persons or discharging, in whole or in part, any obligation incurred for such purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 867, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

31406.

No licensee shall, either by itself or in concert with any of its directors, officers, principal shareholders, or affiliates, any other licensee, or any of the directors, officers, principal shareholders, or affiliates of any other licensee, acquire or hold control of any business firm, except as follows:

(a) Any licensee which has provided financing assistance to a business firm may, if and to the extent necessary to protect its interests as a creditor of, or investor in, such business firm,
 acquire and hold control of such business firm; provided, however, that such licensee shall divest itself of such control as soon as practicable and in any event within three years after acquiring such control or such longer period as the commissioner may approve.

(b) Any licensee may, with the prior approval of the commissioner, acquire and hold control of a corporation which is licensed as a small business investment company under the Small Business Investment Act of 1958.

(c) Any licensee may, with the prior approval of the commissioner, acquire and hold control of a corporation which is licensed as a personal property broker under Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000).

(d) Any licensee may, with the prior approval of the commissioner, acquire and hold control of a corporation which transacts business as a
 local development company in accordance with all applicable provisions of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958 and of the regulations of the Small Business Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 658.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31408.

No licensee shall, except with the prior approval of the commissioner, guarantee the debt of any other person or otherwise lend its credit to any other person; provided, however, that, whenever a licensee sells to another person an obligation to pay money, which obligation is owned by such licensee, such licensee may guarantee the payment of such obligation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 659.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31409.

No licensee shall, except with the prior approval of the commissioner, provide a lien or security interest in any of its property for the purpose of securing an obligation of, or an obligation incurred for the benefit of, any other person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 660.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31410.

This section creates and authorizes an exempt class of persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the State Constitution. The restrictions upon rates of interest contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the State Constitution shall not apply to any loans made by, or forbearances of, any licensee. This section shall apply retroactively to any such loans or forbearances.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 31953 by Stats. 1987, Ch. 867, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Records, Reports, and Examinations [31500. - 31509.]

31500.

Each licensee shall adopt as its fiscal year the period from July 1st to and including the following June 30th.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31501.

Each licensee shall make and keep such books, accounts, and other records in such form and in such manner as the commissioner may by regulation or order require. All records so required shall be kept at such place and shall be preserved for such time as the commissioner may by regulation or order specify.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 661.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31502.

No licensee shall, except with the prior approval of the commissioner, enter or carry on its books or records any asset at a valuation exceeding the actual cost of such asset to such licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 662.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31503.

The commissioner may by order require a licensee to write down any asset on its books and records to a valuation which represents its then value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 663.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31504.

Each licensee shall, not more than 90 days after the close of each of its fiscal years or within such longer period as the commissioner may by regulation or order specify, file with the commissioner an audit report containing:

(a) Financial statements (including balance sheet, statement of income or loss, statement of changes in capital accounts, and statement of changes in financial position or, in the case of a licensee which is a California nonprofit corporation, comparable financial
 statements) for or as of the end of such fiscal year, prepared with audit by an independent certified public accountant or an independent public accountant in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;

(b) Report, certificate, or opinion of such independent certified public accountant or independent public account, stating that such financial statements were prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles; and

(c) Such other information as the commissioner may by regulation or order require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 664.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31506.

Each licensee, each director, officer, and employee of a licensee, and each parent and subsidiary of a licensee shall file with the commissioner such reports as and when the commissioner may by regulation or order require. In addition, each affiliate of a licensee (other than a parent or subsidiary of the licensee) shall file with the commissioner such reports regarding transactions between the affiliate and the licensee as and when the commissioner may require. Each report shall be in such form, shall contain such information, shall be signed in such manner,
 and shall (if the commissioner so requires by regulation or order) be verified in such manner, as the commissioner may by regulation or order require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 665.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31507.

(a) The commissioner shall examine each licensee not less frequently than once each calendar year.

(b) (1) The commissioner may at any time examine any licensee or any parent or subsidiary of a licensee.

(2) The commissioner may at any time examine any office of any licensee within or outside of this state.

(3) The commissioner
 may at any time examine any affiliate of a licensee (other than a parent or subsidiary of the licensee) but only with respect to matters relating to transactions between the affiliate and the licensee.

(c) The directors, officers, and employees of any licensee or of any affiliate of a licensee being examined by the commissioner and any other person having custody of any of the books, accounts, or records of the licensee or affiliate shall exhibit to the commissioner, on request, any or all of the books, accounts, and other records of the licensee or affiliate and shall otherwise facilitate the examination so far as it may be in their power to do so. However, in the case of an examination of an affiliate of a licensee other than a parent or subsidiary of the licensee, only books, accounts, and records of the affiliate that relate to transactions between the affiliate and the licensee shall be subject to this subdivision.

(d) The commissioner may, if in his or her opinion it is necessary in the examination of any licensee or of any affiliate of a licensee, retain any certified public accountant, attorney, appraiser, or other person to assist him or her, and the licensee shall pay, within 10 days after receipt of a statement from the commissioner, the fees of that person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 404, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

31508.

(a) No licensee shall, except with the prior approval of the commissioner, cause or permit any other person to make or keep any of its books, accounts, or other records.

(b) In case any person other than a licensee makes or keeps any of the books, accounts, or other records of such licensee, the provisions of this division and of any regulation or order issued under this division shall apply to such person with respect to the performance of such services and with respect to
 such books, accounts, and other records to the same extent as if such person were such licensee.

(c) In case any person other than an affiliate of a licensee makes or keeps any of the books, accounts, or other records of such affiliate or, in the case of an affiliate other than a parent or subsidiary of the licensee, the books, accounts, and other records of the affiliate that relate to transactions between the affiliate and the licensee, the provisions of this division and of any regulation or order issued under this division shall apply to such person with respect to such books, accounts, and other records to the same extent as if such person were such affiliate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 667.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31509.

The commissioner may publish any report filed with him or her under this division or under any regulation or order issued under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 668.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Acquisition of Control [31550. - 31552.]

31550.

No person shall, except with the prior approval of the commissioner, acquire control of a licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 669.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31551.

If the commissioner finds, with respect to an application for approval to acquire control of a licensee:

(a) That the applicant and the directors and officers of the applicant are of good character and sound financial standing;

(b) That it is reasonable to believe that, if the applicant acquires control of the licensee, the applicant will comply with all applicable provisions of this division and of any regulation or order issued
 under this division; and

(c) That the applicant’s plans, if any, to make any major change in the business, corporate structure, or management of the licensee are not detrimental to the safety and soundness of the licensee or to the public convenience and advantage;

The commissioner shall approve the application. If, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds otherwise, he or she shall deny the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 670.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31551.5.

(a) For purposes of Section 31551, the commissioner may find:

(1) That an applicant or a director or officer of an applicant is not of good character if such person has been convicted of, or has pleaded nolo contendere to, a crime involving fraud or dishonesty.

(2) That an applicant’s plan to make a major change in the management of a licensee is detrimental to the safety and soundness of the licensee and to
 the public convenience and advantage if the plan provides for a person who has been convicted of, or has pleaded nolo contendere to, a crime involving fraud or dishonesty to become a director or officer of the licensee.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not be deemed to be the only grounds upon which the commissioner may find, for purposes of Section 31551, that an applicant or a director or officer of an applicant is not of good character or that an applicant’s plan to make a major change in the management of a licensee is detrimental to the safety and soundness of a licensee or to the public convenience and advantage.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 671.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31552.

The commissioner may, by such regulations or orders as he or she deems necessary and appropriate, either unconditionally or upon specified terms and conditions or for specified periods, exempt from the provisions of this chapter any person or transaction or class of persons or transactions, if he or she finds such action to be in the public interest and that the regulation of such persons or transactions is not necessary for the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 672.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Merger and Purchase or Sale of Business [31600. - 31605.]

31600.

In this chapter:

(a) “Acquiring licensee” means:

(1) In the case of a merger, the licensee which is the surviving corporation; 

(2) In the case of a purchase or sale, the licensee which is the purchaser.

(b) “Disappearing corporation” has the meaning set forth in Section 165 of the Corporations Code.

(c) “Surviving corporation” has the meaning set forth in
 Section 190 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31601.

No licensee shall merge with any other corporation unless:

(a) In case such licensee is the surviving corporation, such merger shall have first been approved by the commissioner;

(b) In case such licensee is a disappearing corporation, the surviving corporation is a licensee and such merger shall have first been approved by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 673.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31602.

No licensee shall purchase all or substantially all of the business of any other person unless such purchase shall have first been approved by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 674.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31603.

No licensee shall sell all or substantially all of its business to any other person unless such other person is a licensee and such sale shall have first been approved by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 675.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31604.

If the commissioner finds, with respect to an application for approval of a merger, purchase, or sale:

(a) That the merger, purchase, or sale will be safe and sound with respect to the acquiring licensee;

(b) That it is reasonable to believe that, upon consummation of the merger, purchase, or sale, the acquiring licensee will comply with all applicable provisions of this division and of any regulation or order issued under this
 division; and

(c) That the merger, purchase, or sale will not be detrimental to the public convenience and advantage, or, if the merger, purchase, or sale would be detrimental to the public convenience and advantage, that it is necessary in the interests of the safety and soundness of any of the parties to it;

The commissioner shall approve the application. If, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds otherwise, he or she shall deny the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 676.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31605.

The commissioner may, by such regulations or orders as he or she deems necessary and appropriate, either unconditionally or upon specified terms and conditions or for specified periods, exempt from the provisions of this chapter any person or transaction or class of persons or transactions, if he or she finds such action to be in the public interest and that the regulation of such persons or transactions is not necessary for the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 677.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Voluntary Surrender of License [31650. - 31651.]

31650.

Any licensee may surrender its license by filing with the commissioner such license and a report which shall be in such form, shall contain such information, shall be signed in such manner, and shall (if the commissioner so requires by regulation or order) be verified in such manner, as the commissioner may by regulation or order require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 678.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31651.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), a voluntary surrender of a license shall be effective on the 30th day after such license and the report called for in Section 31650 are filed with the commissioner or on such earlier date as the commissioner may by order specify.

(b) If a proceeding to revoke or suspend a license is pending at the time when such license and the report called for in Section 31650 are filed with the commissioner or if a proceeding to revoke
 or suspend a license or to impose conditions upon the surrender of a license is instituted before the 30th day after such license and the report called for in Section 31650 are filed with the commissioner, the voluntary surrender of such license shall become effective at such time and upon such conditions as the commissioner may by order specify.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 679.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Crimes and Criminal Penalties [31800. - 31881.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [31800. - 31802.]

31800.

It shall be unlawful for any person willfully to make any untrue statement of a material fact in any application or report filed with the commissioner under this division or under any regulation or order issued under this division, or willfully to omit to state in any such application or report any material fact which is required to be stated therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 694.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31801.

It shall be unlawful for any person having custody of any of the books, accounts, or other records of a licensee willfully to refuse to allow the commissioner, upon request, to inspect or make copies of any of such books, accounts, or other records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 695.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31802.

It shall be unlawful for any person, with intent to deceive any director, officer, employee, auditor, or attorney of a licensee, the commissioner, or any governmental agency, to make any false entry in any of the books, accounts, or other records of such licensee, to omit to make any entry in such books, accounts, or other records which such person is required to make, or to alter, conceal, or destroy any of such books, accounts, or other records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 696.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Conflicts of Interest [31820. - 31829.]

31820.

In this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) “Adviser,” when used with respect to a licensee, means any person who regularly provides legal, accounting, or management services or advice to such licensee.

(b) “Associate,” when used with respect to a licensee, means:

(1) Any principal shareholder, director, officer, manager, agent, or adviser of such licensee;

(2) Any director, officer, partner, general
 manager, agent, employer, or employee of any person referred to in paragraph (1) of this subdivision;

(3) Any person who controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, any person referred to in paragraph (1) of this subdivision, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries;

(4) Any close relative of any person referred to in paragraph (1) of this subdivision;

(5) Any person of which any person referred to in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of this subdivision is a director or officer; or

(6) Any person in which any person referred to in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of this subdivision or any combination of such persons acting in concert owns or controls, directly or indirectly, a 10 percent or greater equity
 interest.

(7) For purposes of this subdivision, any person who is in any of the relationships referred to in paragraphs (1) to (6), inclusive, of this subdivision within six months before or after a licensee provides financing assistance shall be deemed to be in such relationship as of the date when such licensee provides such financing assistance.

(8) For purposes of this subdivision, in case a licensee, in order to protect its interests, designates any person to serve as a director of, officer of, or in any capacity in the management of, a business firm to which such licensee provides financing assistance, such person shall not, on that account, be deemed to have any relationship with such business firm; provided, however, that this paragraph shall not apply in any case where the person has, directly or indirectly, any other financial interest in the business firm or where the
 person, at any time before the licensee provides the financing assistance, served as a director of, officer of, or in any other capacity in the management of, the business firm for a period of 30 days or more.

(c) “Close relative” means ancestor, lineal descendant, brother or sister and lineal descendants of either, spouse, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, brother-in-law, daughter-in-law, or sister-in-law.

(d) “Closing services” means services performed in connection with the providing of financing assistance. “Closing services” includes (but is not limited to) appraising property and preparing credit reports. “Closing services” does not include any services performed after the providing of financing assistance.

(e) “Short-term financing assistance” means any financing assistance with a term of not more than
 five years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31821.

(a) The commissioner may, by such regulations or orders as he or she deems necessary and appropriate, either unconditionally or upon specified terms and conditions and for specified periods, exempt from the provisions of this article any person or transaction or class of persons or transactions, if the commissioner finds such action to be in the public interest and that the regulation of such persons or transactions is not necessary for the purposes of this division.

(b) In
 exempting from the provisions of this article any person or transaction or class of persons or transactions, the commissioner shall give due consideration to any conflict of interest provision of federal law or regulation applicable to such person or transaction governing participants in federal financing programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 697.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31822.

It shall be unlawful for any licensee, directly or indirectly, to provide financing assistance to any of its associates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31823.

(a) It shall be unlawful for any licensee, directly or indirectly, to provide financing assistance to any associate of another licensee if any associate of the first licensee receives, has received, or is about to receive, directly or indirectly, financing assistance or a commitment for financing assistance from such other licensee.

(b) It shall be unlawful for any licensee, directly or indirectly, to provide financing assistance to any associate of another licensee if any associate of the first licensee receives, has received, or is about to receive, directly or indirectly financing
 assistance or a commitment for financing assistance from a third licensee pursuant to any contract, understanding, or arrangement among such licensees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31824.

It shall be unlawful for any licensee or for any associate of a licensee, directly or indirectly, to borrow money from:

(a) Any person to which such licensee has provided, or has committed to provide, financing assistance;

(b) Any director of, officer of, or person who owns a 10 percent or greater equity interest in, any person referred to in subdivision (a); or

(c) Any close relative of any person referred to in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31825.

It shall be unlawful for any licensee, directly or indirectly, to provide financing assistance to discharge, or to free other funds for use in discharging, in whole or in part, an obligation to any associate of such licensee; provided, however, that this section shall not apply to any transaction effected by an associate of a licensee in the normal course of such associate’s business involving a line of credit or short-term financing assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31826.

It shall be unlawful for any licensee, directly or indirectly, to provide financing assistance for the purchase of property from any associate of such licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31827.

It shall be unlawful for any licensee, directly or indirectly, to provide financing assistance to any person to whom any associate of such licensee provides financing assistance, either contemporaneously with, or within one year before or after, the providing of financing assistance by the licensee, if the terms on which the licensee provides financing assistance are less favorable to the licensee than the terms on which the associate provides financing assistance to the associate. In any case where the financing assistance provided by the associate of the licensee is of a different kind from the financing assistance provided by the licensee, the burden shall be on the
 licensee to prove that the terms on which it provided financing assistance were at least as favorable to it as the terms on which the associate provided financing assistance to the associate. This section shall not apply to any transaction effected by an associate of a licensee in the normal course of such associate’s business involving a line of credit or short-term financing assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31828.

It shall be unlawful for any associate of a licensee, directly or indirectly, to receive from any person to whom such licensee provides financing assistance, any compensation in connection with the providing of such financing assistance or anything of value for procuring, influencing, or attempting to procure or influence, the licensee’s action with respect to the providing of the financing assistance. This section shall not apply to the receipt by an associate of a licensee of fees for bona fide closing services performed by such associate; provided, however, that the associate is, with the consent and knowledge of the person to whom the financing assistance is provided,
 designated by the licensee to perform such services, that the services are appropriate and necessary in the circumstances, that the fees for the services are approved as reasonable by the licensee, and that the fees for the services are collected by the licensee on behalf of the associate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31829.

It shall be unlawful for any licensee, directly or indirectly, to sell or otherwise transfer any of its assets to any of its associates.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Criminal Penalties [31880. - 31881.]

31880.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall upon conviction be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or be imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail for not more than one year, or be punished by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 114.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

31881.

Nothing in this division limits the power of the state to punish any person for any act which constitutes a crime under any statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Civil Penalties [31900. - 31901.]

31900.

If, after notice and a hearing, the commissioner finds that any person has violated any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division, the commissioner may order such person to pay to the commissioner a civil penalty in such amount as the commissioner may specify; provided, however, that the amount of such civil penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation, or in the case of a continuing violation, one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day for which such violation continues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 698.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

31901.

The provisions of Section 31900 are additional to, and not alternative to, other provisions of this division which authorize the commissioner to issue orders or to take other action on account of a violation of any provision of this division or of any regulation or order issued under this division; provided, however, that no person who has been finally convicted under Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 31800) of this division on account of a violation of any provision of Chapter 12 shall be liable to pay a civil penalty under Section 31900 on account of such
 violation, nor shall any person who has paid a civil penalty under Section 31900 on account of a violation of any provision of Chapter 12 be liable to criminal prosecution under Chapter 12 on account of such violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 699.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 14. Transition Provisions [31950. - 31952.]

31950.

In this chapter:

(a) “Member” has the meaning set forth in the old law.

(b) “Old corporation” means a corporation organized under the old law.

(c) “Old law” means Part 6 (commencing with Section 14200), Division 3, Title 1 of the Corporations Code, as added by Chapter 985 of the Statutes of 1975.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------

31951.

Except as otherwise provided in Sections 31004 and 31952, the provisions of the General Corporation Law (Division 1 (commencing with Section 100), Title 1 of the Corporations Code) shall, on and after the effective date of this division, apply to each old corporation; provided, however, that, for purposes of the provisions of Chapter 23 (commencing with Section 2300) of the General Corporation Law, with respect to each old corporation:

(a) The term “effective date” shall mean the effective date of this division.

(b) The term “prior law” shall
 mean the old law.

(c) Each old corporation shall be deemed to be a corporation referred to in Section 162 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 965.)
-------------------------------------------

31952.

In case any old corporation has, on the effective date of this division, any members:

(a) The old law shall continue to apply with respect to matters relating to the rights and obligations of such members with respect to such old corporation and to matters relating to the rights and obligations of such old corporation with respect to such members, so long as any of such members continues to be a member of such old corporation; provided, however, that, notwithstanding any provision of the old law to the contrary, any member of an old corporation may withdraw from membership in such old corporation by giving to
 such old corporation written notice of its intent to withdraw from membership in such old corporation not less than 10 days before the date on which it intends to withdraw from membership in such old corporation, which date shall be specified in such notice, and the withdrawal of such member from membership in such old corporation shall be effective on such date.

(b) No person shall, on or after the effective date of this division, become a member of such old corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 15.5. STATE ASSISTANCE FUND FOR ENTERPRISE, BUSINESS AND INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION [32000. - 32823.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [32000. - 32219.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title, Construction and Severability [32000. - 32002.]

32000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the “State Assistance Fund for Enterprise Act of 1989.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1040, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

32001.

In this division, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) A reference to a statute or to a regulation includes such statute or regulation as amended, whether before or after the effective date of this division, as well as any new statute or regulation substituted for such statute or regulation after the effective date of this division.

(b) A reference to a governmental agency or to a public officer includes any governmental agency or public officer which succeeds after the effective date of this division to substantially the
 same functions as those performed by such governmental agency or public officer on the effective date of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32002.

If any provision of this division or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, illegal, or unenforceable, such invalidity, illegality, or enforceability shall not affect other provisions or applications of this division which can be given effect without the invalid, illegal, or unenforceable provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this division are declared to be severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 819, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Legislative Purposes [32101. - 32101.]

32101.

The purposes of this division are the following:

(a) To enhance the availability of financial assistance for small business in California.

(b) To increase the cost effectiveness and efficiency of financial assistance to small businesses provided by the state.

(c) To provide maximum utilization of available federal assistance programs, including, but not limited to, the Small Business Administration’s loan guarantee program.

(d) To reduce duplication and overlap in the provisions of financing assistance to small businesses through increased coordination and direction of state assistance programs.

(e) To provide the maximum degree of leverage of the limited state resources available to assist small business, consistent with sound business practices and fiduciary responsibility.
